Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB656.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5648YC (4) 91 th/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 321.45, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (7) A person who purchases a vehicle via 3 a remote sale in accordance with section 322.3, subsection 12. 4 Sec. 2. Section 321.67, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 5 to read as follows: 6 1. No person, except Except as provided in sections 321.23 7 and 321.45 , section 321.52, subsection 2 , paragraph âbâ , and 8 section 321.52, subsection 4 , paragraph âaâ , and section 322.3, 9 subsection 12, a person shall not sell or otherwise dispose 10 of a registered vehicle or a vehicle subject to registration 11 without delivering to the purchaser or transferee thereof a 12 certificate of title with such assignment thereon as may be 13 necessary to show title in the purchaser. 14 Sec. 3. Section 322.3, subsection 12, unnumbered paragraph 15 1, Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 16 A retail seller licensed under this chapter may engage in 17 remote sales of motor vehicles located at a place of business 18 of the retail seller , as listed on the license, under all of 19 the following conditions: 20 Sec. 4. Section 322.3, subsection 12, paragraphs a and c, 21 Code 2026, are amended to read as follows: 22 a. The dealer shall possess, at the time of the sale, the 23 certificate of title , or an electronic copy thereof, to any 24 motor vehicle offered for remote sale. 25 c. The dealer shall not sign a proposed purchase agreement 26 until the dealer receives an executed purchase agreement from 27 the buyer. A signed purchase agreement must be delivered to 28 the dealerâs place of business. 29 Sec. 5. Section 322.3, subsection 12, Code 2026, is amended 30 by adding the following new paragraph: 31 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. A person who purchases a motor vehicle 32 via a remote sale shall acquire right to, claim to, and 33 interest in the motor vehicle at the time of delivery. The 34 seller must otherwise deliver the certificate of title pursuant 35 -1- LSB 5648YC (4) 91 th/ns 1/ 3 H.F. _____ to section 321.45, but may do so within thirty days after 1 delivery of the motor vehicle. 2